Utah statutes.
26-1-7.   Committees within department.
(1)  There are created within the department the following committees:
(a)  Health Facility Committee;
(b)  State Emergency Medical Services Committee;
(c)  Health Data Committee; and
(d)  Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program Advisory
Committee.
(2)  The department shall:
(a)  review all committees and advisory groups in existence before July 1,
2003 that are not listed in Subsection (1) or Section 26-1-7.5, and not
required by state or federal law; and
(b)  beginning no later than July 1, 2003:
(i)  consolidate those advisory groups and committees with other committees or
advisory groups as appropriate to create greater efficiencies and budgetary
savings for the department; and
(ii)  create in writing, time-limited and subject-limited duties for the
advisory groups or committees as necessary to carry out the responsibilities
of the department.
